South Dakota, session 2026, HB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 21-18-9 be AMENDED:
21-18-9. If a garnishee summons, affidavit, and garnishment disclosure is served,
upon receipt by the plaintiff of the garnishee's garnishment disclosure of liability provided
for in § 21-18-27, the garnishee shall must be paid the sum of fifteen forty dollars to
reimburse the garnishee for the expense of preparing the garnishment disclosure, which
sum shall must be taxed as a part of the plaintiff's costs. If the garnishee is not paid, the
garnishment proceeding is void. The return of service of the garnishee summons shall
must include a statement that the sum was paid. The garnishment disclosure shall must
be returned to the plaintiff and filed with the court.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.